Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 13
SPECIAL DISTRICT REFUNDING

32-1-1301. Legislative declaration - applicability.

It is hereby declared that the orderly refunding of any general obligation bonds and any other lawful general obligation indebtedness incurred by any special district, when advantageous to the special district or persons within the special district, will serve a public use and will promote the health, safety, security, and general welfare of the inhabitants thereof and of the people of this state. It is hereby further declared to be the intent of this general assembly that any bonds issued pursuant to this part 13 are not to be considered as additional debt incurred by the special district. It is the intent of this part 13 to provide for a uniform mechanism for refunding for special districts.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1608, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-901 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-1302. Refunding bonds.

Any general obligation bonds issued and any other lawful general obligation indebtedness incurred by any special district may be refunded without an election of the special district issuing or incurring the same, or any successor thereof, in the name of the special district which issued or incurred the indebtedness being refunded, subject to provisions concerning their payment and to any other contractual limitations in the proceedings authorizing their issuance or otherwise appertaining thereto.

Said refunding may be accomplished by the issuance of bonds to refund, pay, and discharge all or any part of such outstanding indebtedness, including part of a single issue of general obligation bonds and including any interest thereon in arrears or about to become due, and for the purpose of:

Avoiding or terminating any default in the payment of interest on or principal of, or both principal of and interest on, said indebtedness;

Reducing interest costs or effecting other economies;

Modifying or eliminating restrictive contractual limitations relating to the incurring of additional indebtedness or to any system or facility, or improvement thereto; or

Any combination of the foregoing purposes.

Refunding bonds may be delivered in exchange for the outstanding bonds refunded or may be sold as provided in this part 13 for an original issue of bonds.

Any revenue bonds issued or any other obligation pledging solely the revenue of the special district incurred by any special district may be refunded in the manner provided by section 31-35-412, C.R.S., or article 54 or 56 of title 11, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1609, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-902 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-1303. Limitations upon issuance.

No general obligation bond or other general obligation indebtedness may be refunded unless the holder thereof voluntarily surrenders the same for exchange or payment or the said indebtedness either matures or is callable for prior redemption under its terms within ten years from the date of issuance of the refunding bonds, and provision shall have been made in said refunding for paying the bonds or other indebtedness being refunded within said period of time.

The refunding bonds may mature at one time or from time to time but not exceeding thirty years from the date of issuance of the refunding bonds. The interest rates on such refunding bonds shall be determined by the board.

The principal amount of the refunding bonds may exceed the principal amount of the refunded bonds or other indebtedness being refunded if the aggregate principal and interest costs of the refunding bonds do not exceed such unaccrued cost of the indebtedness refunded except:

To the extent any interest on the indebtedness refunded in arrears or about to become due is capitalized with the proceeds of said refunding bonds; or

To the extent necessary to capitalize and pay, with the proceeds of said refunding bonds, the following:

All costs and expenses of said refunding procedures;

The amounts of the prior redemption premiums, if any, on the indebtedness being refunded; and

Any interest in arrears or about to become due and payable.

The principal amount of the refunding bonds may also be less than or the same as the principal amount of the indebtedness being refunded so long as provision is duly and sufficiently made for the payment of the refunded bonds.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1609, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-903 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-1304. Use of proceeds of refunding bonds.

The proceeds of general obligation refunding bonds shall either be immediately applied to the retirement of the indebtedness being refunded or be placed in escrow in any state or national bank within this state which is a member of the federal deposit insurance corporation and which has trust powers to be applied to the payment of the indebtedness being refunded upon presentation therefor; but, to the extent any incidental expenses have been capitalized, such refunding bond proceeds may be used to defray such expenses, and any accrued interest on the refunding bonds may be applied to the payment of the interest thereon and the principal thereof, or both interest and principal, or may be deposited in a reserve therefor, as the board may determine. Any such escrow shall not necessarily be limited to proceeds of refunding bonds but may include other moneys available for its purpose. Any proceeds in escrow, pending such use, may be invested or reinvested in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. Such proceeds and investments in escrow, together with any interest to be derived from any such investment, shall be in an amount at all times sufficient as to principal, interest, any prior redemption premium due, and any charges of the escrow agent payable therefrom to pay the indebtedness being refunded as the same becomes due at their respective maturities or due at any designated prior redemption dates in connection with which the board shall exercise a prior redemption option. Any purchaser of any refunding bond issued under this part 13 shall in no manner be responsible for the application of the proceeds thereof by the special district or any of its officers, agents, or employees.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1610, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1134, § 83, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-904 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-1305. Combination of refunding and other bonds.

General obligation bonds for refunding and general obligation bonds for any other purpose authorized in this article may be issued separately or issued in combination in one or more series by any special district.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1610, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-905 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-1306. Board's determination final.

The determination of the board that the limitations under this part 13 imposed upon the issuance of refunding bonds have been met shall be conclusive in the absence of fraud or arbitrary and gross abuse of discretion.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1610, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-906 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-1307. Construction of part 13.

The powers conferred by this part 13 are in addition and supplemental to, and not in substitution for, and the limitations imposed by this part 13 shall not affect the powers conferred by any other law. Bonds may be issued under this part 13 without regard to the provisions of any other law. Insofar as the provisions of this part 13 are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this part 13 shall be controlling.

This part 13 shall be liberally construed in order to accomplish its purposes.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1610, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 32-1-907 and 32-1-908 as they existed prior to 1981.